Idaho, session 2026, S1343.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
encourage the judges of Idaho to finish their terms in office. In 1890, it
was the intention of those who wrote the Constitution of the State of Idaho
that the people of Idaho would elect their judges. When judges finish their
terms in office, the people choose the replacement judge through the elec-
toral process. This legislation promotes the election of judges by the peo-
ple.
SECTION 2. That Section 1-2001, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-2001. SUPREME COURT JUSTICES, COURT OF APPEALS JUDGES AND DISTRICT
JUDGES -- AGE OF RETIREMENT -- COMPENSATION ON RETIREMENT.
(1)(a) Every person who served as a justice of the supreme court or
judge of the court of appeals or district judge of the district court and
who was receiving benefits from the judges' retirement fund before July
1, 2000, for such service, shall be entitled to benefits from the fund
according to the formula for calculating such benefits as provided in
subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) The term "retirement board" as used in this chapter shall mean the
retirement board created by section 59-1304, Idaho Code.
(2) Any person who is now serving or who shall hereafter serve as a jus-
tice of the supreme court, a judge of the court of appeals, or a district
judge of a district court of this state shall prior to retirement elect in
writing to retire under either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, pro-
vided that a person who has first assumed office as a supreme court justice,
judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1, 2012,
and who is eligible to receive an annual retirement compensation only un-
der the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section, may retire
only under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Any person who fails to make
the election provided for in this subsection prior to retirement or who, pur-
suant to subsection (9)(a) of this section, is ineligible to elect and re-
ceive retirement compensation pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (b) of
this subsection shall receive retirement compensation under the provisions
of paragraph (a) of this subsection.


(a)(i) On or after July 1, 2000, any person who has served or who
is now serving or who shall hereafter serve as a justice of the
supreme court, a judge of the court of appeals, or a district judge
of a district court of this state may leave office or retire and
be entitled to receive, and to have paid from the date of his re-
tirement until death, an annual retirement compensation payable
in monthly installments on the first day of each month.
(ii) A person who assumed office as a supreme court justice, judge
of the court of appeals or district judge prior to July 1, 2012,
shall receive an annual retirement compensation based upon a per-
centage of the current annual compensation of the highest office
in which such person served, unless such person makes an irrevoca-
ble election no later than August 1, 2012, to receive upon retire-
ment an annual retirement compensation based upon the provisions
in this paragraph applicable to justices or judges who first as-
sumed such office on or after July 1, 2012.
(iii) A person who first assumed office as a supreme court justice,
judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1,
2012, shall receive an annual retirement compensation based upon
a percentage of the annual compensation at the time of such per-
son's retirement or resignation from the highest office in which
such person served, and such compensation shall be adjusted annu-
ally by the postretirement allowance adjustment established pur-
suant to section 59-1355, Idaho Code.
(iv) The percentage applicable to all retiring justices and
judges shall be equal to five percent (5%) multiplied by the number
of years served as either justice or judge, or both, for the first
ten (10) years of service plus two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)
multiplied by the remaining number of years served as either jus-
tice or judge, or both, but in any event the total percentage shall
not be greater than seventy-five percent (75%).
(b)(i) On or after July 1, 2000, any person who is now serving
or who shall hereafter serve as a justice of the supreme court, a
judge of the court of appeals, or a district judge of a district
court of this state may retire from office and be entitled to
receive, and to have paid from the date of his retirement until
death, an annual retirement compensation payable in monthly in-
stallments on the first day of each month.
(ii) A person who assumed office as a supreme court justice, judge
of the court of appeals or district judge prior to July 1, 2012,
shall receive an annual retirement compensation based upon a per-
centage of the current annual compensation of the highest office
in which such person served, unless such person makes an irrevoca-
ble election no later than August 1, 2012, to receive upon retire-
ment an annual retirement compensation based upon the provisions
of this paragraph applicable to justices or judges who first as-
sumed such office on or after July 1, 2012.
(iii) A person who first assumed office as a supreme court justice,
judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1,
2012, shall receive an annual retirement compensation based upon a


percentage of the annual compensation at the time of such person's
retirement or resignation of the highest office in which such per-
son served, and such compensation shall be adjusted annually by
the postretirement allowance adjustment established pursuant to
section 59-1355, Idaho Code.
(iv) The percentage applicable to all retiring justices and
judges shall be equal to five percent (5%) multiplied by the num-
ber of years served as either justice or judge, or both, for the
first ten (10) years of service plus two and one-half percent (2
1/2%) multiplied by the remaining number of years served as either
justice or judge, or both, plus two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)
multiplied by five (5) years senior judge service, but in any event
the total percentage shall not be greater than seventy-five per-
cent (75%).
(c)(i) A justice or judge electing to retire under paragraph (b)
of this subsection and who assumed office as a supreme court jus-
tice, judge of the court of appeals or district judge prior to July
1, 2012, shall serve as a senior judge, without compensation other
than annual health benefits, for thirty-five (35) days per year
for a period of five (5) years.
(ii) A justice or judge electing to retire under paragraph (b) of
this subsection who first assumed office as a supreme court jus-
tice, judge of the court of appeals or district judge on or after
July 1, 2012, shall serve as a senior judge, without compensation
other than annual health benefits, for sixty (60) days per year for
a period of five (5) years.
(iii) A justice or judge who serves more than the required number
of days per year may carry over the additional days to fulfill the
senior judge service obligation in future years. The terms and
conditions of such senior judge service shall be as provided under
section 1-2005, Idaho Code.
(d) Upon certification from the chief justice that any justice or judge
who retired under paragraph (b) of this subsection has failed to perform
the senior judge services required under paragraph (c) of this subsec-
tion, and has not been relieved of the obligations to perform those ser-
vices in the manner provided by this subsection, the judges' retirement
fund shall recalculate the retirement compensation benefits of the non-
complying justice or judge under paragraph (a) of this subsection, and
the noncomplying justice or judge shall thereafter receive only the re-
calculated amount.
(e) A justice or judge may be relieved of the senior judge service obli-
gation imposed by this subsection if he fails for good cause to complete
the obligation. A retired justice or judge who is relieved of the obli-
gation to serve as a senior judge shall continue to receive the retire-
ment allowance provided under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(f) "Good cause" includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Physical or mental incapacitation of a justice or judge that
prevents the justice or judge from discharging the duties of judi-
cial office;


(ii) Failure of the supreme court to assign a senior judge to the
requisite amount of senior judge service, whether because of in-
sufficient need for senior judges, a determination by the supreme
court that the skills of a senior judge do not match the needs of
the courts, clerical mistake or otherwise; or
(iii) Death of a senior judge.
(g) "Good cause" does not include:
(i) A senior judge's refusal, without good cause, to accept se-
nior judge assignments sufficient to meet the required amount; or
(ii) A senior judge's affirmative voluntary act that makes him un-
qualified to serve as a judge of this state including, but not lim-
ited to, failure to maintain a residence within the state, com-
mencing the practice of law other than as a mediator, arbitrator
or similar alternative dispute resolution function, acceptance of
a position in another branch of state government or political sub-
division, or the acceptance of a position in the government of the
United States or of another state or nation.
(h) The supreme court may make rules for the implementation of this sub-
section.
(3) On or after July 1, 2000, each person who has served but is not re-
ceiving benefits or who is now serving or who shall hereafter serve who shall
leave office or retire as justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, or district judge of a district court in this state shall be eligi-
ble to receive an annual retirement compensation when such person shall meet
one (1) of the following eligibility criteria:
(a) Attaining the age of sixty-five (65) years and having a minimum ser-
vice of four (4) years;
(b) Attaining the age of sixty (60) years and having a minimum service
of ten (10) years;
(c) Attaining the age of fifty-five (55) years and having a minimum ser-
vice of fifteen (15) years; or
(d) At any age after twenty (20) years of service.
(4)(a) On or after July 1, 2000, each justice or judge who is now serv-
ing or who shall hereafter be appointed or elected and who shall retire
by reason of disability preventing him from further performance of the
duties of his office, after a service in any or all of said courts of four
(4) years or more, shall, upon retirement, be entitled to receive and to
have paid to him until death an annual retirement compensation payable
in monthly installments on the first day of each month.
(b) A person who assumed office as a supreme court justice, judge of
the court of appeals or district judge prior to July 1, 2012, shall re-
ceive an annual retirement compensation based upon a percentage of the
current annual compensation of the highest office in which such person
served, unless such person makes an irrevocable election no later than
August 1, 2012, to receive upon retirement an annual retirement compen-
sation based upon the provisions in this subsection applicable to jus-
tices or judges who first assumed such office on or after July 1, 2012.
(c) A person who first assumed office as a supreme court justice, judge
of the court of appeals or district judge on or after July 1, 2012,
shall receive an annual retirement compensation based upon a percentage


of the annual compensation at the time of such person's retirement or
resignation from the highest office in which such person has served,
and such compensation shall be adjusted annually by the postretirement
allowance adjustment established pursuant to section 59-1355, Idaho
Code.
(d) The percentage applicable to all justices and judges who retire by
reason of disability shall be equal to five percent (5%) multiplied by
the number of years served as either justice or judge, or both, for the
first ten (10) years of service, plus two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)
multiplied by the remaining number of years served as either justice or
judge, or both, but such percentage shall not exceed seventy-five per-
cent (75%).
(5) All retirement compensation shall be paid out of the judges' re-
tirement fund, provided however, that a justice or judge who has served less
than four (4) years shall be entitled to have refunded to him all contribu-
tions made by him to the judges' retirement fund, with six and one-half per-
cent (6 1/2%) interest computed annually but shall not be entitled to any
other compensation from the fund.
(6) A person who has retired from the office of supreme court justice,
judge of the court of appeals or district judge prior to July 1, 2012, or
any other person receiving benefits as of July 1, 2012, may make an irrev-
ocable election no later than August 1, 2012, to thereafter receive an an-
nual retirement compensation or allowance equal to the amount of the annual
retirement compensation or allowance such person was receiving as of July
1, 2012, and to have such compensation or allowance thereafter adjusted an-
nually by the postretirement allowance adjustment established pursuant to
section 59-1355, Idaho Code.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any person
who makes an election to remain in the public employee retirement system of
Idaho as provided in section 1-2011, Idaho Code, shall not participate in
the judges' retirement fund established in this chapter, but shall continue
to participate in the public employee retirement system of Idaho and be
governed under the provisions of that system, except as provided in section
1-2005, Idaho Code.
(8)(a) Effective July 1, 2024, a judge eligible to receive retirement
compensation under the judges' retirement fund and pursuant to the pro-
visions of this section shall be entitled to a retirement bonus after
retirement of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) if:
(i) The judge retires at the conclusion of the term of office to
which the judge was most recently elected or appointed;
(ii) The judge has given written notice to the supreme court,
which shall announce the upcoming retirement to the general public
and the legislature in the same manner that judicial vacancies are
customarily announced;
(iii) Such announcement is made not less than one (1) year in ad-
vance of the retirement; and
(iv) The retiring judge is replaced in office by a judge who is
elected, not appointed. This requirement shall not apply if no
candidate stands for election to replace the retiring judge.


(b) If the requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection are not met,
then such retiring judge shall not be eligible to receive the retirement
bonus provided for in this subsection.
(9)(a) A supreme court justice, judge of the court of appeals, or dis-
trict judge of the district court who files a declaration of candidacy
after July 1, 2026, to run for another term of office and who retires
prior to the conclusion of the term of office to which the judge was most
recently elected or appointed shall not be eligible to serve as a senior
judge under this section and may not elect to receive retirement compen-
sation under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(b) Each candidate for supreme court justice, judge of the court of ap-
peals, or district judge who stands for election shall acknowledge to
the supreme court in writing that the candidate is aware of the provi-
sions of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply
to a justice of the supreme court, a judge of the court of appeals, or a
district judge of a district court who:
(i) Gave written notice of his retirement date and election to
receive retirement compensation under subsection (2)(b) of this
section prior to July 1, 2026; or
(ii) Retires prior to the conclusion of the term of office due to
illness or other incapacitation that prevents the justice or judge
from performing the duties of office.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.